sv: Del av fjäder: Kroppsfjäder; Dun; Blandat sortiment; Plym/fluff; Spole/skaft; Stjärtfjäder; Vingfjäder; Övrigt
zh-TW: 羽毛部位: 體羽; 絨羽; 綜合混裝; 飾羽/絨毛; 羽管/羽軸; 尾羽; 飛羽; 其他
tr: Tüy bölümü: Gövde tüyü; Kuş tüyü; Karışık çeşit; Tüy/hav; Telek/sap; Kuyruk tüyü; Kanat tüyü; Diğer
th: ส่วนของขน: ขนลำตัว; ขนอ่อน; คละแบบ; ขนนกประดับ/ขนฟู; ก้านขนนก/แกนขนนก; ขนหาง; ขนปีก; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 羽毛部位: 体羽; 绒羽; 混合搭配; 羽饰/绒毛; 羽根/羽轴; 尾羽; 翼羽; 其他
ro-RO: Partea de pană: Pană de corp; Puf; Sortiment mixt; Pană/puf; Calamus/ax; Pană de coadă; Pană de aripă; Altele
da: Fjerdel: Kropsfjer; Dun; Blandet sortiment; Fjerbusk/fnug; Fjerpen/skaft; Halefjer; Vingefjer; Andet
pt-BR: Parte de pena: Pena de contorno; Penugem; Variedade mista; Pluma/penugem; Haste/ráquis; Pena de cauda; Pena de asa; Outra
cs: Součást pera: Tělové peří; Prachové peří; Různé druhy; Chmýří; Brk/osten; Ocasní peří; Křídelní peří; Jiné
fi: Sulan osa: Peitinhöyhen; Untuva; Sekalainen lajitelma; Töyhtö / untuva; Ruoti / varsi; Pyrstösulka; Siipisulka; Muu
de: Federteil: Körperfeder; Daune; Gemischtes Sortiment; Schmuckfeder/Flaum; Kiel/Schaft; Schwanzfeder; Flügelfeder; Sonstige
ko: 깃털 부위: 몸통 깃털; 솜털; 혼합 세트; 장식용 깃털/솜털; 깃대/깃촉; 꼬리 깃털; 날개 깃털; 기타
nb: Fjærdel: Kroppsfjær; Dun; Assortert blanding; Prydfjær/dun; Skaft/fjærpenn; Halefjær; Vingefjær; Annet
sl-SI: Del peresa: Telesno pero; Puh; Mešana izbira; Puh/puhasto pero; Steblo/tulc; Repno pero; Krilno pero; Drugo
sk-SK: Časť s perím: Telové pierko; Páperie; Zmiešaný sortiment; Ozdobné perie/páperie; Brko/stonka; Chvostové pierko; Krídlové pierko; Iná
lt-LT: Plunksnos dalis: Kūno plunksna; Pūkai; Mišrus asortimentas; Puošnioji plunksna / pūkelis; Plunksnakotis; Uodegos plunksna; Sparno plunksna; Kita
it: Parte della piuma: Piuma da corpo; Piumino; Assortimento misto; Piuma/Lanugine; Calamo/Rachide; Piuma della coda; Piuma dell'ala; Altra
bg-BG: Част от перото: Перо от тялото; Пух; Смесен асортимент; Пух/пера; Ствол/ос; Перо от опашката; Перо от крило; Друго
nl: Veergedeelte: Lichaamsveer; Dons; Gemengd assortiment; Pluim/pluis; Pen/schacht; Staartveer; Vleugelveer; Overig
el: Τμήμα φτερού: Φτερό σώματος; Πούπουλο; Ανάμεικτη συλλογή; Λοφίο/χνούδι; Κεντρικός άξονας/στέλεχος; Φτερό ουράς; Φτερό φτερούγας; Άλλο
ru: Часть пера: Покровное перо; Пух; Смесь разных частей; Опахало/пух; Стержень/очин; Хвостовое (рулевое) перо; Маховое перо; Другое
hu: Tollrész: Fedőtoll; Pehely; Vegyes válogatás; Dísztoll/pihe; Tollszár; Farktoll; Szárnytoll; Egyéb
fr: Partie en plumes: Plume de corps; Duvet; Assortiment mixte; Plumet/duvet; Calame/rachis; Plume de queue; Plume d'aile; Autre
pt-PT: Parte da pena: Pena do corpo; Penugem; Sortido misto; Pluma/penugem; Cálamo/haste; Pena da cauda; Pena da asa; Outro
hr-HR: Dio pera: Pero s tijela; Paperje; Mješoviti asortiman; Ukrasno perje / paperje; Badrljica/cijev; Pero s repa; Pero s krila; Ostalo
vi: Phần của lông vũ: Lông mình; Lông tơ; Hỗn hợp; Lông bông/lông xù; Ống lông/cuống lông; Lông đuôi; Lông cánh; Khác
es: Parte de pluma: Pluma de cuerpo; Plumón; Surtido mixto; Pluma/pelusa; Cañón/tallo; Pluma de cola; Pluma de ala; Otra
pl: Część z piór: Pióro okrywowe; Puch; Zestaw mieszany; Pióropusz / puch; Stosina; Pióro ogonowe (sterówka); Lotka; Inna
en: Feather part: Body feather; Down; Mixed assortment; Plume/fluff; Quill/shaft; Tail feather; Wing feather; Other
ja: 羽毛ピース: 体羽; ダウン; ミックスアソート; 飾り羽/綿毛; 軸/羽軸; 尾羽; 風切羽; その他